South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3439.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Title 55 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: CHAPTER 19 South Carolina Blue Origin Flight Lottery Commission Section 55-19-10.  This chapter may be cited as the "South Carolina Blue Origin Flight Lottery Commission Act." Section 55-19-20.  There is created a commission to be known as the South Carolina Blue Origin Flight Lottery Commission, hereinafter referred to in this chapter as "commission." This commission is deemed to be a public body. Section 55-19-30.  (A) The commission is governed by a board composed of seven members as follows: (1) a representative of the McNair Center, appointed by the Governor; (2) a representative of Clemson's College of Engineering, Computing and Applied Sciences, appointed by the Governor; (3) a representative of the Governor's School of Science and Math, appointed by the Governor; (4) Executive Director of the Department of Commerce, or his designee; (5) one member of the House of Representatives, appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; (6) one member of the Senate, appointed by the President of the Senate; and (7) one member of the general public, appointed by the Governor. (B) In making appointments to the commission, the Governor must consider experience, race, gender, and other demographic factors to ensure nondiscrimination, inclusion and representation of all segments of the State to the greatest extent possible. (C) The commission may receive staff assistance from the Department of Administration, as needed. Section 55-19-40.  The commission is established for the purpose of creating a lottery for a South Carolina resident to fly to space on a Blue Origin flight in an annual lottery. The commission also must establish eligibility criteria for participants in this lottery. Criteria must include, but not be limited to, encouraging careers in the field of science, technology, engineering, or mathematics. Section 55-19-50.  The commission must submit a report regarding its activities and eligibility criteria for participants in the lottery to the Governor, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the President of the Senate no later than one year after the effective date of this act. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----